District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-1803

When required.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 16, 1980, D.C. Law 3-99, § 4, 27 DCR 3599
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-156, § 2(e), 29 DCR 3612
Mar. 16, 1993, D.C. Law 9-197, § 22, 39 DCR 9195

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-303.

Editor's Notes

Severability: Section 21 of D.C. Law 9-197 provided that if any provision of the act is held invalid for any reason, the invalidity shall not effect the other provisions which shall be given effect without the invalid provisions.